California, session 20252026, AB2099.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5208.3 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:5208.3. “Customary maintenance” means an activity performed on a display for the purpose of maintaining the display in its existing physical configuration, including, but not limited to, replacing structural members, such as posts and internal bracing, and using stronger materials, without increasing the number of posts.